Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2249
Office; created; state long-term care ombudsman; appointed.

Pursuant to the Older Americans Act, the office of the state long-term care ombudsman is hereby created. The department shall establish and operate the office. The chief executive officer of the department shall appoint the state long-term care ombudsman.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 13;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 768.